Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-212 Contract limitations for
handicapped children and children with intellectual disabilities. Every
individual life insurance policy, every group life insurance policy, and every
hospital or medical expense insurance policy, delivered or issued for delivery
in this State after May 8, 1968, which provides that coverage of a dependent
child shall terminate upon attainment of the limiting age for dependent
children specified in the policy, shall also provide in substance that
attainment of such limiting age shall not operate to terminate coverage of such
child while the child is and continues to be:

(1) Incapable of self-sustaining employment by reason
of intellectual disability or physical handicap, and

(2) Chiefly dependent upon the policyholder for
support and maintenance,

provided proof of such incapacity and dependency is
furnished to the insurer by the policyholder within thirty-one days of the
child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently as may be required by
the insurer, but not more frequently than annually after the two-year period
following child's attainment of the limiting age. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 2011, c 220, §§6, 12]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next